Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-148
Credential; suspended, revoked, or other limitations; apply for reinstatement; when.

(1) A person whose credential has been suspended or has had limitations placed thereon for any reason specified in sections 38-178 and 38-179 may apply for reinstatement of the credential at any time. The application shall include such information as may be required by the department.

(2) A person whose credential has been revoked for any reason specified in such sections may apply for reinstatement of the credential after a period of two years has elapsed from the date of revocation. The application shall include such information as may be required by the department.

Laws 1976, LB 877, § 9;

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 57;

Laws 1986, LB 579, § 49;

Laws 1986, LB 926, § 32;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 23;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 37;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 45;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-161.04;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 48.